Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 34. COUNTY FINANCES

Art. 1676a. AUDITORS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES: DUTIES, POWERS, REPORTS.

Sec. 1. In all counties having a County Auditor and containing a population of not less than seventy-five thousand (75,000), and not more than eighty thousand (80,000), as shown by the last preceding Federal Census, and in which there are Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts and Water Control and Improvement Districts, the County Auditor shall not exercise control over the finances and affairs of such Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, and Water Control and Improvement Districts (or other districts created for improvement or conservation purposes, which are not administered by the Commissioners Court of such counties), but he shall annually, between July 1st and October 1st, carefully audit all books, accounts, records, bills and warrants of any such District for the year ending the 30th of June preceding, and file his report of such audit with the County Clerk of such county.

Sec. 2. The officers and directors of each such District shall, on or before the 10th of each month, make and file with the County Auditor a report in writing, authenticated by such officers and directors, showing the total amount of moneys collected for and expended from the various funds of such District for the calendar month next preceding.

Sec. 3. The method of audit hereby provided for Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, Water Control and Improvement Districts, and all other Districts created for improvement and conservation purposes in counties containing a population of not less than seventy-five thousand (75,000), nor more than eighty thousand (80,000), as shown by the last preceding Federal Census, and not directly administered by the Commissioners Court of such counties, shall supersede all other provisions for auditing the receipts and expenditures of such districts otherwise prescribed by law, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed.

Sec. 4. Only the provisions of this Act and of Articles 1672 and 1673 shall apply in counties having a population of not less than seventy-five thousand (75,000), and not more than eighty thousand (80,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, which contain Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, and Water Control and Improvement Districts.

Sec. 5. If any provision of this Act is held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, same shall not affect the validity of any other provision hereof.

Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 306, ch. 118.

Art. 1676b. AUDITORS IN COUNTIES OF 83,000 TO 83,350 HAVING NAVIGATION DISTRICTS AND OTHER DISTRICTS.

Sec. 1. AUDIT; REPORT. In all counties having a County Auditor and containing a population of not less than eighty-three thousand (83,000) and not more than eighty-three thousand, three hundred and fifty (83,350), as shown by the last preceding Federal Census, and in which there are Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, and Water Control and Improvement Districts, the County Auditor shall not exercise control over the finances and affairs of such Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, and Water Control and Improvement Districts (or other districts created for improvement or conservation purposes, which are not administered by the Commissioners Courts of such counties), but he shall annually, between July 1st and October 1st, carefully audit all books, accounts, records, bills, and warrants of any such district for the year ending the 30th of June preceding, and file his report of such audit with the County Clerk of such county.

Sec. 2. MONTHLY REPORT. The officers and directors of each such district shall, on or before the 10th of each month, make and file with the County Auditor a report in writing, authenticated by such officers and directors, showing the total amount of moneys collected for and expended from the various funds of such district for the calendar month next preceding.

Sec. 3. OTHER LAWS SUPERSEDED--REPEAL. The method of audit hereby provided for Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, Water Control and Improvement Districts, and all other districts created for improvement and conservation purposes in counties containing a population of not less than eighty-three thousand (83,000), nor more than eighty-three thousand, three hundred and fifty (83,350), as shown by the last preceding Federal Census, and not directly administered by the Commissioners Courts of such counties, shall supersede all other provisions for auditing the receipts and expenditures of such districts otherwise prescribed by law, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed.

Sec. 4. EXCLUSIVENESS OF PROVISIONS. Only the provisions of this Act and of Articles 1667, 1672, and 1673 of the Revised Civil Statutes of Texas of 1925, shall apply in counties having a population of not less than eighty-three thousand (83,000), and not more than eighty-three thousand, three hundred and fifty (83,350), according to the last preceding Federal Census, which contain Navigation Districts, Water Improvement Districts, and Water Control and Improvement Districts.

Sec. 5. PARTIAL INVALIDITY. If any provision of this Act is held to be unconstitutional, or otherwise invalid, same shall not affect the validity of any other provision hereof.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 409, ch. 238.

Art. 1677. GOVERNMENTAL ACTS AND PROCEEDINGS OF COUNTIES AFFECTED BY HURRICANE IKE

Sec. 1. APPLICATION. This article applies to any county located in the Hurricane Ike disaster area, as defined by Section 704, Heartland Disaster Tax Relief Act of 2008 (Pub. L. No. 110-343).

Sec. 2. PROCEEDINGS VALIDATED. The governmental acts and proceedings of a county relating to a bond election that was held November 4, 2008, and at which the ballot proposition was approved by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition are validated as of the dates they occurred. The validation includes the preparation and wording of the ballot proposition, any action taken by the county in calling and holding the bond election, and any other action taken by the county before the effective date of this article in connection with the issuance of any bonds approved in the bond election. The acts and proceedings may not be held invalid because they were not performed in accordance with law. A county may take any further action or conduct any further proceeding necessary to complete the issuance of the bonds approved at the bond election, and, when issued, the bonds are valid and binding obligations of the county in accordance with the terms of the bonds.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 991 (H.B. 3854), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.